Missouri, session 2026, HB1893.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 160, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 160.231, to read as follows:
160.231. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Multiple-occupancy restroom or changing area", an area in a private school
building designed or designated to be used by more than one individual at a time and
where individuals may be in various stages of undress in the presence of other
individuals. The term includes, but is not limited to, a school restroom, locker room,
changing room, or shower room;
(2) "Sex", the physical condition of being male or female based on genetics and
physiology as identified on the individual's original birth certificate.
2. A private school that serves students in prekindergarten to grade twelve may
establish, to ensure privacy and safety, one or more multiple-occupancy restrooms or
changing areas designated as follows:
(1) For the exclusive use of the male sex; or
(2) For the exclusive use of the female sex.
3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to individuals entering a
multiple-occupancy restroom or changing area designated for use by the opposite sex
when entering:
(1) For custodial or maintenance purposes, or for the purpose of facility
inspection when not occupied;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 1893 2
(2) To render emergency medical assistance; or
(3) As a parent or guardian accompanying their child, who is eight years of age
or younger, with the permission of the school.
4. (1) No political subdivision shall adopt any ordinance, rule, or regulation
prohibiting a private school from establishing one or more multiple-occupancy
restrooms or changing areas as provided in this section.
(2) If a political subdivision adopts an ordinance, rule, or regulation in violation
of subdivision (1) of this subsection, such political subdivision shall pay the attorney's
fees and costs incurred by a private school in such private school's legal defense against
such ordinance, rule, or regulation.
Section B. Because immediate action is necessary to protect private schools from
liability and allow preparation for the 2026-27 school year, section A of this act is deemed
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health, welfare, peace, and safety, and
is hereby declared to be an emergency act within the meaning of the constitution, and section
A of this act shall be in full force and effect upon its passage and approval.
✔